Idaho statutes. Title 25 ANIMALS
Chapter 12
STOCK GROWERS’ BRANDS

Sec.

§ 25-1201. Definitions. [Repealed.]

§ 25-1202. [Amended and Redesignated.]

§ 25-1202A. [Amended and Redesignated.]

§ 25-1203. [Amended and Redesignated.]

§ 25-1204. [Amended and Redesignated.]

§ 25-1205. [Amended and Redesignated.]

§ 25-1206. Recording certified copy with county recorder. [Repealed.]

§ 25-1207. [Amended and Redesignated.]

§ 25-1208. [Amended and Redesignated.]

§ 25-1209. [Amended and Redesignated.]

§ 25-1210. [Amended and Redesignated.]

§ 25-1211. Brand as evidence of ownership. [Repealed.]

§ 25-1211a. Recorded brand or mark

Certificate. [Repealed.]

§ 25-1212, 25-1213. Sheep owner to notify owner of strange sheep — Sale of branded animals. [Repealed.]

§ 25-1214. Partnership brands. [Repealed.]

§ 25-1215. [Amended and Redesignated.]